Mississippi, session 2026, HB232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 41-9-353, Mississippi Code of 1972: 41-9-353.  (1)  There is established the Specialty Doctors to Rural Hospitals Grant Program. (2)  The Specialty Doctors to Rural Hospitals Grant Program shall be administered by the State Department of Health for the purpose of ensuring the availability of specialty doctors in rural hospitals when a major hospital indicates to a rural hospital emergency doctor that the major hospital is on diversion. (3)  The department shall administer and distribute grant funds to rural hospitals for such purpose.  The department shall administer the program with the intent to ensure rural hospital patients have the opportunity to be treated by specialty doctors when a major hospital indicates to a rural hospital emergency doctor that the major hospital is on diversion. (4)  The department shall establish a payment structure that considers the following: (a)  The size of the rural hospital; (b)  The distance of the rural hospital from a major hospital; (c)  The health demographics of the rural hospital; (d)  The need for a specific type of specialty doctor in a specific rural hospital. (5)  The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to accomplish the purpose of the program. (6)  For purposes of this section, "rural hospital" means a licensed Mississippi hospital that has fifty (50) or fewer licensed general acute, nonspecialty beds. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.